Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6351.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 23. (1) A public authority may borrow money and issue notes and bonds to acquire, construct, or purchase public transportation facilities and to otherwise finance and carry out its the public authority's powers and duties. The notes and bonds may pledge, be payable from, and may be issued in anticipation of payment of the proceeds of any of the methods of financing described in section 17 or elsewhere in this act or as may be provided by law. (2) The public authority may issue bonds or notes at any time to retire, fund, or refund, in whole or in part, outstanding bonds or notes issued pursuant to under this act, or for transportation purposes under any other act, including the payment of interest accrued, or to accrue, to the earliest or any subsequent date of redemption, purchase, or maturity of the bonds or notes, redemption premium, if any, and any commission, service fees, and other expenses necessary to be paid in connection with the bonds or notes, whether the bonds or notes to be refunded have matured or are redeemable or shall will at a later date mature or become redeemable. If considered advisable by the public authority, the public authority may issue bonds or notes partly to refund outstanding bonds or notes and partly for any other purpose contemplated by this act. (3) The bonds and notes issued pursuant to under section 22 or this section may be issued pursuant to, in accordance with, and shall be are subject to, the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. (4) The public authority, by resolution of its the board of the public authority, shall provide for the issuance of the notes or bonds for the purpose of paying part or all of the cost of the public transportation facilities or authorized programs, which cost may include an includes all of the following: (a) An allowance for legal, engineering, architectural, and consulting services. ; interest (b) Interest on the bonds or notes becoming due before the collection of the first revenue available for the payment of the interest as determined by the public authority. ; a (c) A debt service reserve. ; and other (d) Other necessary incidental expenses. (5) Principal of, and interest and redemption premiums on, the bonds or notes issued under this section shall be are payable solely from revenue , and the other sources described in this section , or otherwise described in this act. Any interest shall be Interest is payable on the dates as determined in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or notes. (6) The board of the public authority, in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or notes, shall determine the all of the following: (a) The principal amount of the bonds or notes to be issued. , the (b) The registration provisions. , the (c) The bond or note denominations. , the (d) The bond or note designations. , the (e) The rights of prior redemption of the bonds or notes at the option of the public authority or the holders of the bonds or notes. , the (f) The maximum rate of interest. , the (g) The method of execution of the bonds or notes. , and any (h) Any other provisions respecting the bonds or notes, the rights of the holders of the bonds or notes, the security for the bonds or notes, and the procedures for disbursement of the bond or note proceeds of the bonds or notes and for the investment of the proceeds of bonds or notes and money for the payment of bonds or notes. (7) The board of the public authority in the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or notes may provide for the any of the following: (a) The assignment of the revenues pledged to 1 of the paying agents for the bonds or notes or to a trustee, as provided in this act. The board of the public authority, in the resolution or resolutions authorizing the bonds or notes, may provide for the (b) The terms and conditions upon on which the holders of the bonds or notes, or any portion of the bond or noteholders, or any trustee for the bond or noteholders , shall be is entitled to the appointment of a receiver. The resolution authorizing the bonds or notes may provide for the (c) The appointment of a trustee for the bond or noteholders. , The resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or notes may give to the trustee the appropriate rights, duties, remedies, and powers, with or without the execution of a deed of trust or mortgage, necessary and appropriate to secure the bonds or notes. (8) (5) All bonds and notes and the interest coupons attached to the bonds or notes are declared to be fully negotiable and to have all of the qualities incident to negotiable instruments under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102, 440.12501, subject only to the provisions for registration of the bonds or notes which may that appear on the bonds or notes. (9) (6) The property of the public authority, its income and operation, and any vendor, vendee, lessor, and lessee interest in any property sold or leased pursuant to under section 24 shall be are exempt from all taxation by this state or any of its political subdivisions of this state, and all bonds and notes of the public authority, the interest on the bonds and notes, and their the transfer shall be of the bonds and notes are exempt from all taxation by this state or any of its political subdivisions of this state. This state covenants with the purchasers and all subsequent holders and transferees of notes and bonds issued by the public authority under this act, in consideration of the acceptance of and payment for the notes and bonds, that the notes and bonds of the fund, public authority issued pursuant to in accordance with this act, the interest on the notes and bonds and notes, the transfer of the bonds or notes, and all its the fees, charges, gifts, grants, revenues, receipts, and other money received or to be received and pledged to pay or secure the payment of the notes or bonds shall are at all times be free and exempt from all state or local taxation as provided by the laws of this state. (10) (7) The public authority may issue additional bonds or notes with respect to the pledge of the revenues with previously issued bonds or notes of the public authority for the purpose and under the terms and conditions provided in the resolution authorizing the previous issue of bonds or notes. The public authority may enter into agreements with the holders of the bonds or notes or with others for the bonds or notes to be delivered to the public authority or others before the stated maturities of the bonds or notes. (11) (8) This state, a political subdivision, or a private corporation, partnership, or individual may advance money or deliver property to the public authority to finance or to carry out its powers and duties. The public authority may agree to repay the advances or pay for the property within a period not exceeding 40 years, from the proceeds of its the public authority's bonds or notes or from other funds legally available for use, with or without interest as may be agreed at the time of advance or of repayment. The obligation of the public authority to make the repayment or payment may be evidenced by a contract or note or 1 or more notes, which contract or note may pledge the full faith and credit of the public authority, but the contract or note shall is not be an obligation within the meaning of the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821. A political subdivision, subject to applicable constitutional limitations and procedures, may pledge its the political subdivision's full faith and credit for the payment of bonds or notes of the public authority upon on adoption of a resolution or a majority vote of the members elected to and serving on its the governing body so of the political subdivision providing the political subdivision's full faith and credit. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.